Nebraska, session 109, LB602.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 12 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Data Elimination and Limiting Extensive Tracking and
Exchange Act or the Delete Act.
Sec. 2. For the purposes of the Delete Act, unless otherwise
specified, the definitions found in section 87-1102 apply and:
(1) Authorized agent means:
(a) A person designated by a consumer to act on the consumer's
behalf;
(b) A parent or legal guardian who acts on behalf of the parent's
child or on behalf of a child for whom the guardian has legal
responsibility; or
(c) A guardian or conservator who acts on behalf of a consumer who
is subject to a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective
arrangement;
(2) Data broker means a controller, or a unit or units of a
controller, separately or together, that knowingly:
(a) Processes and sells the personal data of a consumer with whom
the controller does not have a direct relationship; or
(b) Licenses to third parties the personal data of a consumer with
whom the controller does not have a direct relationship;
(3) Direct relationship with a controller means a consumer is a:
(a) Customer, client, subscriber, user, or registered user of the
controller's goods or services within the last five calendar years;
(b) Employee, contractor, or agent of the controller; or
(c) Investor in the controller; and
(4) Opt-out means a controller can no longer process the consumer's
personal data for the purposes described in subdivision (2)(e) of section
87-1107.
Sec. 3. (1) The Delete Act only applies to any person specified in
subsection (1) of section 87-1103.
(2) The Delete Act does not apply to any entity specified in
-2-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
subsection (2) of section 87-1103.
Sec. 4. The Delete Act does not apply to the information and
records specified in section 87-1104.
Sec. 5. A data broker that maintains an Internet website or mobile
application shall post a conspicuous notice on the website or application
that:
(1) States that the entity maintaining the website or application is
a data broker;
(2) Is clear, not misleading, and readily accessible by the general
public, including individuals with a disability; and
(3) Contains language required for inclusion in the notice by the
Secretary of State.
Sec. 6. (1) A data broker conducting business in this state shall
develop, implement, and maintain a comprehensive information security
program that is written in one or more readily accessible parts and
contains administrative, technical, and physical safeguards that are
appropriate for the:
(a) Data broker's size, scope, and type of business;
(b) Amount of resources available to the data broker;
(c) Amount of data stored by the data broker; and
(d) Need for security and confidentiality of personal data stored by
the data broker.
(2) The comprehensive information security program required by this
section shall:
(a) Incorporate safeguards that are consistent with the safeguards
for the protection of personal data and information of a similar
character under state or federal laws and regulations applicable to the
data broker;
(b) Designate one or more employees of the data broker to maintain
the program;
(c) Require the identification and assessment of reasonably
-3-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
foreseeable internal and external risks to the security, confidentiality,
and integrity of any electronic, paper, or other record containing
personal data, and the establishment of a process for evaluating and
improving, as necessary, the effectiveness of the current safeguards for
limiting those risks, including by:
(i) Requiring ongoing employee and contractor education and
training, including education and training for temporary employees and
contractors of the data broker, on the proper use of security procedures
and protocols and the importance of personal data security;
(ii) Mandating employee compliance with policies and procedures
established under the program; and
(iii) Providing a means for detecting and preventing security system
failures;
(d) Include security policies for the data broker's employees
relating to the storage, access, and transportation of records containing
personal data outside of the broker's physical business premises;
(e) Provide disciplinary measures for violations of a policy or
procedure established under the program;
(f) Include measures for preventing a terminated employee from
accessing records containing personal data;
(g) Provide policies for the supervision of third-party service
providers that include:
(i) Taking reasonable steps to select and retain third-party service
providers that are capable of maintaining appropriate security measures
to protect personal data consistent with applicable law; and
(ii) Requiring third-party service providers by contract to
implement and maintain appropriate security measures for personal data;
(h) Provide reasonable restrictions on physical access to records
containing personal data, including by requiring the records containing
the data to be stored in a locked facility, storage area, or container;
(i) Include regular monitoring to ensure that the program is
-4-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
operating in a manner reasonably calculated to prevent unauthorized
access to or unauthorized use of personal data and, as necessary,
upgrading information safeguards to limit the risk of unauthorized access
to or unauthorized use of personal data;
(j) Require the regular review of the scope of the program's
security measures that shall occur:
(i) At least annually; and
(ii) Whenever there is a material change in the data broker's
business practices that may reasonably affect the security or integrity
of records containing personal data;
(k) Require the documentation of responsive actions taken in
connection with any incident involving a breach of security, including a
mandatory post-incident review of each event and the actions taken, if
any, to make changes in business practices relating to protection of
personal data in response to that event; and
(l) To the extent technically feasible, include the following
procedures and protocols with respect to computer system security
requirements or procedures and protocols providing a higher degree of
security, for the protection of personal data:
(i) The use of secure user authentication protocols that include
each of the following features:
(A) Controlling user log-in credentials and other identifiers;
(B) Using a reasonably secure method of assigning and selecting
passwords or using unique identifier technologies, which may include
biometrics or token devices;
(C) Controlling data security passwords to ensure that the passwords
are kept in a location and format that do not compromise the security of
the data the passwords protect;
(D) Restricting access to only active users and active user
accounts; and
(E) Blocking access to user credentials or identification after
-5-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
multiple unsuccessful attempts to gain access;
(ii) The use of secure access control measures that include:
(A) Restricting access to records and files containing personal data
to only employees or contractors who need access to that personal data to
perform the job duties of the employees or contractors; and
(B) Assigning to each employee or contractor with access to a
computer containing personal data unique identification and a password,
which shall not be a vendor-supplied default password, or using another
protocol reasonably designed to maintain the integrity of the security of
the access controls to personal data;
(iii) Encryption of:
(A) Transmitted records and files containing personal data that will
travel across public networks; and
(B) Data containing personal data that is transmitted wirelessly;
(iv) Reasonable monitoring of systems for unauthorized use of or
access to personal data;
(v) Encryption of all personal data stored on laptop computers or
other portable devices;
(vi) For files containing personal data on a system that is
connected to the Internet, the use of reasonably current firewall
protection and operating system security patches that are reasonably
designed to maintain the integrity of the personal data; and
(vii) The use of any:
(A) Reasonably current version of system security agent software
that shall include malware protection and reasonably current patches and
virus definitions; or
(B) Version of system security agent software that is supportable
with current patches and virus definitions and is set to receive the most
current security updates on a regular basis.
(3) A violation of this section by a data broker constitutes a
deceptive trade practice.
-6-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
Sec. 7. (1) A data broker shall maintain reasonable procedures
designed to ensure that the personal data it discloses is used for a
legitimate and legal purpose.
(2) Such procedures shall require that prospective users of the
personal data identify themselves, certify the purposes for which the
information is sought, and certify that the information shall be used for
no other purpose.
(3) A data broker shall make a reasonable effort to verify the
identity of a new prospective user and the uses certified by the
prospective user prior to furnishing the user's personal data.
(4) A data broker shall not furnish personal data to any person if
it has reasonable grounds for believing that the personal data will not
be used for a legitimate and legal purpose.
(5) A violation of this section by a data broker constitutes a
deceptive trade practice.
Sec. 8. The registration information provided in section 9 of this
act and the accessible deletion mechanism described in section 10 of this
act shall be publicly accessible on the website of the Secretary of
State.
Sec. 9. (1) On or before January 31 of each year, a data broker
shall:
(a) Register with the Secretary of State;
(b) Pay a registration fee in an amount determined by the Secretary
of State, but not to exceed three hundred dollars; and
(c) Provide the following information with the registration:
(i) The legal name of the data broker;
(ii) The contact person and the primary physical address, email
address, telephone number, and Internet website address for the data
broker;
(iii) A description of the categories of data the data broker
processes and transfers;
-7-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
(iv) A statement of whether or not the data broker implements a
purchaser credentialing process pursuant to section 7 of this act;
(v) If the data broker has actual knowledge that the data broker
possesses personal data of a known child:
(A) A statement detailing the data collection practices, databases,
sales activities, and opt-out policies that are applicable to the
personal data of a known child; and
(B) A statement on how the data broker complies with applicable
federal and state law regarding the collection, use, or disclosure of
personal data from and about a child on the Internet;
(vi) The number of security breaches the data broker has experienced
during the year immediately preceding the year in which the registration
is filed, and, if known, the total number of consumers affected by each
breach;
(vii) Whether the data broker collects precise geolocation of
consumers;
(viii) Beginning January 1, 2031, whether the data broker has
undergone an audit pursuant to subsection (4) of section 10 of this act
and, if so, the most recent year in which the data broker has submitted a
report resulting from the audit to the Secretary of State;
(ix) Beginning January 1, 2029, the following annual metrics
pursuant to section 10 of this act:
(A) The number of deletion requests received;
(B) The number of deletion requests processed;
(C) The number of deletion requests denied because the consumer
request cannot be verified; and
(D) The number of deletion requests denied because retention of the
consumer's personal data is required by law; and
(x) Any additional information or explanation the data broker
chooses to provide concerning its data collection practices.
(2)(a) A data broker that fails to register as required by this
-8-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
section shall pay to the Secretary of State:
(i) A civil penalty of two hundred dollars for each day that the
data broker fails to register. All such civil penalties shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska;
(ii) An amount equal to the fees that were due during the period the
data broker failed to register; and
(iii) Any reasonable costs incurred by the Attorney General in the
investigation and administration of the action as the court deems
appropriate.
(b) A data broker that fails to provide all registration information
required in this section shall file an amendment that includes any
omitted information no later than thirty days after receiving
notification of the omission from the Secretary of State and shall pay a
civil penalty of one thousand dollars to the Secretary of State for each
day that the data broker does not file an amendment providing the omitted
information. All such civil penalties shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of
the Constitution of Nebraska.
(c) A data broker that files materially incorrect information in its
registration shall:
(i) Pay to the Secretary of State a civil penalty of twenty-five
thousand dollars. All such civil penalties shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of
the Constitution of Nebraska; and
(ii) Correct the incorrect information no later than thirty days
after discovery or notification of the incorrect information and, if it
fails to correct the information, the data broker shall pay to the
Secretary of State an additional civil penalty of one thousand dollars
per day for each day the data broker fails to correct the information.
All such civil penalties shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
-9-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 10. (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the Secretary of State
shall establish an accessible deletion mechanism that:
(a) Implements and maintains reasonable security procedures and
practices, including administrative, physical, and technical safeguards
appropriate to the nature of the information and the purposes for which
the personal data will be used and to protect a consumer's personal data
from unauthorized use, disclosure, access, destruction, or modification;
(b) Allows a consumer, through a single verifiable consumer request,
to request that every data broker that maintains any personal data about
the consumer delete the personal data;
(c) Allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific data brokers
from a request made;
(d) Allows a consumer to alter a previous request made after at
least forty-five days have passed since the consumer last made a request;
(e) Allows a consumer to request the deletion of all personal data
related to that consumer through a single deletion request;
(f) Permits a consumer to securely submit information in one or more
privacy-protecting ways, as determined by the Secretary of State, to aid
in the deletion request;
(g) Allows a consumer to make a request using a website operated by
the Secretary of State;
(h) Does not charge a consumer to make a request;
(i) Is readily accessible and usable by consumers with disabilities;
(j) Supports the ability of a consumer's authorized agents to aid in
the deletion request;
(k) Allows the consumer or their authorized agent to verify the
status of the consumer's deletion request; and
(l) Provides a description of the following:
(i) The deletion permitted by this section;
-10-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
(ii) The process for submitting a deletion request pursuant to this
section; and
(iii) Examples of the types of information that may be deleted.
(2)(a) Beginning August 1, 2028, a data broker shall access the
accessible deletion mechanism established in this section at least once
every forty-five days and shall:
(i) Process all verifiable deletion requests the data broker has
received from consumers in the previous forty-five days and delete such
personal data;
(ii) Process a request as an opt-out of the consumer's personal
data;
(iii) Direct all service providers and contractors associated with
the data broker to:
(A) Delete all personal data related to a consumer who has made a
verifiable deletion request; and
(B) Process a request as an opt-out of the consumer's personal data;
and
(iv) Not use or disclose any information submitted by a consumer
through the accessible deletion mechanism for any other purpose besides
the authority provided in this section, including for marketing purposes.
(b) A data broker may deny a consumer's request to delete a
consumer's personal data made pursuant to this section if retention of
the consumer's personal data is required by law.
(c) The Secretary of State may charge an access fee to a data broker
to use the accessible deletion mechanism that does not exceed the
reasonable costs of the Secretary of State for providing access to such
mechanism.
(3) Beginning August 1, 2028, once a data broker has processed a
verifiable consumer request to delete a consumer's personal data, the
data broker shall:
(a) Delete all personal data of the consumer at least once every
-11-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
forty-five days unless:
(i) The consumer alters the consumer's decision; or
(ii) Retention of the consumer's personal data is required by law;
and
(b) Not sell new personal data of the consumer unless the consumer
requests otherwise;
(4)(a) A data broker shall undergo an audit by an independent third
party selected by the Secretary of State to determine compliance with
this section at least once every three years, with the first audit taking
place on or before December 31, 2030.
(b) For an audit completed pursuant to this section, the data broker
shall submit the report resulting from the audit and any related
materials to the Secretary of State within five business days after a
written request from the Secretary of State.
(c) A data broker shall maintain all reports and materials resulting
from audits conducted pursuant to this section for at least six years.
(5) A data broker that fails to comply with subsections (1) through
(4) of this section shall pay a civil penalty of two hundred dollars per
day to the Secretary of State for each deletion request the data broker
fails to complete as required by this section.
Sec. 11. (1) The Attorney General may:
(a) Bring an action to collect any civil penalty imposed under this
section; and
(b) Seek appropriate injunctive relief for any violation of the
Delete Act.
(2) The Attorney General may recover reasonable attorney's fees and
costs incurred in bringing an action under the Delete Act.
Sec. 12. The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Delete Act.
Sec. 13. Section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-12-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
87-302 (a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in
the course of his or her business, vocation, or occupation, he or she:
(1) Passes off goods or services as those of another;
(2) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the
source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;
(3) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to
affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by,
another;
(4) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic
origin in connection with goods or services;
(5) Represents that goods or services have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do
not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status,
affiliation, or connection that he or she does not have;
(6) Represents that goods or services do not have sponsorship,
approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities
that they have or that a person does not have a sponsorship, approval,
status, affiliation, or connection that he or she has;
(7) Represents that goods are original or new if they are
deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand,
except that sellers may repair damage to and make adjustments on or
replace parts of otherwise new goods in an effort to place such goods in
compliance with factory specifications;
(8) Represents that goods or services are of a particular standard,
quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if
they are of another;
(9) Disparages the goods, services, or business of another by false
or misleading representation of fact;
(10) Advertises goods or services with intent not to sell them as
advertised or advertises the price in any manner calculated or tending to
mislead or in any way deceive a person;
-13-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
(11) Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply
reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a
limitation of quantity;
(12) Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the
reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;
(13) Uses or promotes the use of or establishes, operates, or
participates in a pyramid promotional scheme in connection with the
solicitation of such scheme to members of the public. This subdivision
shall not be construed to prohibit a plan or operation, or to define a
plan or operation as a pyramid promotional scheme, based on the fact that
participants in the plan or operation give consideration in return for
the right to receive compensation based upon purchases of goods,
services, or intangible property by participants for personal use,
consumption, or resale so long as the plan or operation does not promote
or induce inventory loading and the plan or operation implements an
appropriate inventory repurchase program;
(14) With respect to a sale or lease to a natural person of goods or
services purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, household,
or agricultural purposes, uses or employs any referral or chain referral
sales technique, plan, arrangement, or agreement;
(15) Knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a privacy
policy, published on the Internet or otherwise distributed or published,
regarding the use of personal information submitted by members of the
public;
(16) Uses any scheme or device to defraud by means of:
(i) Obtaining money or property by knowingly false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises; or
(ii) Selling, distributing, supplying, furnishing, or procuring any
property for the purpose of furthering such scheme;
(17) Offers an unsolicited check, through the mail or by other
means, to promote goods or services if the cashing or depositing of the
-14-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
check obligates the endorser or payee identified on the check to pay for
goods or services. This subdivision does not apply to an extension of
credit or an offer to lend money;
(18) Mails or causes to be sent an unsolicited billing statement,
invoice, or other document that appears to obligate the consumer to make
a payment for services or merchandise he or she did not order;
(19)(i) Installs, offers to install, or makes available for
installation or download a covered file-sharing program on a computer not
owned by such person without providing clear and conspicuous notice to
the owner or authorized user of the computer that files on that computer
will be made available to the public and without requiring intentional
and affirmative activation of the file-sharing function of such covered
file-sharing program by the owner or authorized user of the computer; or
(ii) Prevents reasonable efforts to block the installation,
execution, or disabling of a covered file-sharing program;
(20) Violates any provision of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection
Act;
(21) In connection with the solicitation of funds or other assets
for any charitable purpose, or in connection with any solicitation which
represents that funds or assets will be used for any charitable purpose,
uses or employs any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise,
misrepresentation, unfair practice, or concealment, suppression, or
omission of any material fact;
(22)(i) In the manufacture, production, importation, distribution,
promotion, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sale of
a substance:
(A) Makes a deceptive or misleading representation or designation,
or omits material information, about a substance or fails to identify the
contents of the package or the nature of the substance contained inside
the package; or
(B) Causes confusion or misunderstanding as to the effects a
-15-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
substance causes when ingested, injected, inhaled, or otherwise
introduced into the human body.
(ii) A person shall be deemed to have committed a violation of the
Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act for each individually packaged
product that is either manufactured, produced, imported, distributed,
promoted, displayed for sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or
sold in violation of this section. A violation under this subdivision (a)
(22) shall be treated as a separate and distinct violation from any other
offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the
person was in violation of this section;
(23)(i) Manufactures, produces, publishes, distributes, monetizes,
promotes, or otherwise makes publicly available any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, any obscene material, or any material that is
harmful to minors in which any person depicted as a participant or
observer:
(A) Is under eighteen years of age;
(B) Is a trafficking victim;
(C) Has not expressly and voluntarily consented to such person's
depiction; or
(D) Participated in any act depicted without consent.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(23) does not apply to any
telecommunications service.
(iii) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(23):
(A) Harmful to minors has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 254, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024;
(B) Obscene material has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(C) Promote means to use any mechanism or publication, or take any
action, that suggests, highlights, advertises, markets, curates,
backlinks, hashtags, or otherwise directs, attempts to direct, or
encourages traffic toward specific materials, including acts carried out
affirmatively, through automation, algorithmically, and via other
-16-

LB602 LB602
2025 2025
technical means both known and unknown at this time;
(D) Publish means to communicate or make information available to
another person via an Internet website, regardless of whether the person
consuming, viewing, or receiving the material gives any consideration for
the published material;
(E) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830;
(F) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct has the same
meaning as in section 28-1463.02; and
(G) Without consent has the same meaning as in section 28-318; or
(24) Offers or enters into a right-to-list home sale agreement as
defined in section 81-885.01; or .
(25) Violates section 6 or 7 of this act.
(b) In order to prevail in an action under the Uniform Deceptive
Trade Practices Act, a complainant need not prove competition between the
parties.
(c) This section does not affect unfair trade practices otherwise
actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.
Sec. 14. Original section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-17-